Hawaii statutes.
§464-6 Board of professional engineers,
etc., members; appointment; tenure; qualifications. There shall be a state
board of professional engineers, architects, surveyors, and landscape
architects hereinafter called "the board". The board shall consist of
fourteen members, including at least four professional engineers, three
professional architects, two professional surveyors, two professional landscape
architects, and three public members. Each county shall be represented by at
least one member who is a resident of the county. Each member shall hold over
after the expiration of the member's term until the member's successor is duly
appointed and qualified.

Each member shall have been a resident of the
State for at least three years. A member representing the profession shall
have been engaged in the practice of the member's profession for at least five
years immediately preceding the date of the member's appointment. Any member
of the board who incurs expenses in connection with the preparation and grading
of examination papers shall be reimbursed for those expenses with the approval
of the department. [L 1923, c 227, §2; RL 1925, §3684; am L 1933, c 134, §§1,
6; RL 1935, §7035; RL 1945, §7607; am L 1949, c 306, §2; RL 1955, §166-6; am L
Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §5; am L 1967, c 85, §2; HRS §464-6; am L 1970, c 85, §4; am L
1978, c 208, §12; am L 1982, c 204, §8; am L 1983, c 155, §2; gen ch 1985; am L
1989, c 210, §8; am L 1992, c 202, §153; ree L 1993, c 322, §14]

Cross References

Design claim conciliation panel, see chapter 672B.

Attorney General Opinions

This statute is constitutional, with regard to the use of the
phrase "appointed and qualified" to describe when a successor's
appointment terminates a holdover member's position. Att. Gen. Op. 16-3.

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next